Maryland, session 2026, HB0826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Phased in value” has the meaning stated in § 8–103 of the Tax –
Property Article.
(3) “Subdivision” has the meaning stated in § 8–104 of the Tax – Property
Article.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for a taxable year beginning after
June 30, 2026, but before July 1, 2029, the assessed value of residential real property in
the State, including the phased in value of the residential real property, may not be
increased over the prior value unless:
(1) the zoning classification is changed at the initiative of the owner or
anyone having an interest in the property;
(2) a change in use or character occurs;
(3) substantially completed improvements are made that add at least
$100,000 in value to the property;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0826*

HOUSE BILL 826
(4) an error in calculation or measurement of the real property caused the
value to be erroneous;
(5) a residential use assessment is terminated in accordance with § 8–226
of the Tax – Property Article; or
(6) a subdivision occurs.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.